Maryland, session 2026, HB0579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0579*

HOUSE BILL 579
Article – Tax – Property
7–309.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) “HOMEOWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(B) THE FIRST $50,000 OF THE ASSESSMENT OF A DWELLING IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO STATE PROPERTY TAX IF THE HOMEOWNER:
(1) IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD; AND
(2) QUALIFIES TO RECEIVE THE CREDIT UNDER § 9–105 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
9–105.
(b) (1) If there is an increase in property assessment as calculated under this
section, the State and the governing body of each county and of each municipal corporation
shall grant a property tax credit under this section against the State, county, and municipal
corporation property tax imposed on real property by the State, county, or municipal
corporation.
(2) A property tax credit granted under this section shall be applicable to
any State, county, or municipal corporation property tax and any property tax imposed for
a bicounty commission.
(d) (6) (i) Except as provided under paragraph (7) of this subsection, to
qualify for the credit under this section, a homeowner shall submit an application for the
credit to the Department as provided in this paragraph.
(ii) The application shall:
1. be made on the form that:
A. the Department provides; AND

HOUSE BILL 579 3
B. INCLUDES A CHECKBOX BY WHICH A HOMEOWNER
SHALL INDICATE WHETHER THE HOMEOWNER IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD;
2. provide the information required by the form;
3. include a statement by the homeowner under oath that the
facts stated in the application are true, correct, and complete; and
4. except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph,
be filed on or before the May 1 preceding the first taxable year for which the property tax
credit under this section is to be allowed.
(e) (1) For each taxable year, the property tax credit under this section is
calculated by:
(i) multiplying the prior year’s taxable assessment by the
homestead credit percentage as provided under paragraph (2) OR (6) of this subsection;
(ii) subtracting that amount from the current year’s assessment; and
(iii) if the difference is a positive number, multiplying the difference
by the applicable property tax rate for the current year.
(2) [For] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, FOR each taxable year, the homestead credit percentage under paragraph
(1)(i) of this subsection is:
(i) for the State property tax and for any property tax imposed for a
bicounty commission, 110%;
(ii) for the county property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the county
under paragraph (3) of this subsection; or
2. if the county has not set a percentage for the taxable year
under paragraph (3) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph [(6)] (7) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage in effect for the
county for the preceding taxable year; and
(iii) for the municipal corporation property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the
municipal corporation under paragraph (4) of this subsection; or

HOUSE BILL 579
2. if the municipal corporation has not set a percentage
under paragraph (4) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph [(7)] (8) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year
for the county in which the property is located.
(3) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore City and the governing body of a county on or before March 15 of any year
shall set, by law, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the
following July 1.
(4) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, on or before March 25 of any
year, the governing body of a municipal corporation may set or alter, by law, a homestead
credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the following July 1 and any subsequent
taxable year.
(5) The homestead credit percentage for any county or municipal
corporation property tax:
(i) may not be less than 100% or exceed 110% for any taxable year;
and
(ii) shall be expressed in increments of 1 percentage point.
(6) FOR A HOMEOWNER IN BALTIMORE COUNTY WHO IS AT LEAST 65
YEARS OLD, THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT PERCENTAGE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF
THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE STATE, COUNTY, AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROPERTY TAX IS 100%.
(7) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City and the governing body
of a county shall notify the Department of any action taken under paragraph (3) of this
subsection on or before March 15 preceding the taxable year for which the action is taken.
[(7)] (8) A municipal corporation shall notify the Department of any
action taken under paragraph (4) of this subsection on or before March 25 preceding the
taxable year for which the action is taken.
9–305.
(J) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
TITLE.
(III) “HOMEOWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF
THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 579 5
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL GRANT A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED ON A DWELLING IF THE HOMEOWNER:
(I) IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD; AND
(II) QUALIFIES TO RECEIVE THE CREDIT UNDER § 9–105 OF THIS
TITLE.
(3) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
EQUALS THE TAX ON THE FIRST $50,000 OF THE ASSESSMENT OF THE DWELLING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.